Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2818.01
Drug sample or sample medication;
defined.

Drug
sample or sample medication means a unit of a prescription drug that is not
intended to be sold and is intended to promote the sale of the drug. Each
sample unit shall bear a label that clearly denotes its status as a drug sample,
which may include, but need not be limited to, the words sample, not for sale,
or professional courtesy package.

Laws 2011, LB179, § 4.